District of Columbia statutes.
4-1104

Rules.

Within 120 days of March 16, 1989, the D.C. General Hospital Commission shall, pursuant to § 44-1920 [repealed], issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-210, § 5, 36 DCR 478
1981 Ed., § 3-1104.